Utah statutes.
52-1-1.   Official bonds to run to state, county, city or other agency.

When the law directs that a public officer shall give a bond without prescribing to whom it shall run it shall be made, if he is a state officer, to the state; if a county, precinct or district officer, to the county; if a municipal officer, to the city or town; and if a school officer, to the board of education.



No Change Since 1953

